Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-8-113 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If there is cause to believe a crime has been committed,
pursuant to Sections 1111 or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, by an employee or contractor of the Department of Human
Services against a child who is under the legal custody,
HB2185 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

supe rvision, or authority of the Department, the Department shall
exercise due diligence in ensuring action has been taken by law
enforcement, which may include, but shall not be limited to,
conducting an investigation or filing a report. The Department
shall follow up with law enforcement every thirty (30) days after
the initial report is made to law enforcement until the case is
resolved or the child is no longer in the custody of the Department.
Documentation of these actions shall be placed in the child's file.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-621 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If there is cause to believe a crime has been committed,
pursuant to Sections 1111 or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, by an employee or contractor of the Office of Juvenile
Affairs against a child who is under the legal custody, supervision,
or authority of the Office, the Office shall exercise due diligence
in ensuring action has been taken by law enforcement, which may
include, but shall not be limited to, conducting an investigation or
filing a report. The Office shall follow up with law enforcement
every thirty (30) days after the initial report is made to law
enforcement until the case is resolved or the child is no longer in
the custody of the Office. Documentation of these actions shall be
placed in the child's file.

HB2185 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-118 of Title 30, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If there is cause to believe a crime has been committed,
pursuant to Sections 1111 or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, by an employee or contractor of a county, municipality, or
political subdivision of this state against a child who is under the
legal custody, supervision, or authority of the county,
municipality, or political subdivision, the county, municipality, or
political subdivision shall exercise due diligence in ensuring
action has been taken by law enforcement, which may include, but
shall not be limited to, conducting an investigation or filing a
report. The county, municipality, or political subdivision shall
follow up with law enforcement every thirty (30) days after the
initial report is made to law enforcement until the case is resolved
or the child is no longer in the custody of the county,
municipality, or political subdivision. Documentation of these
actions shall be placed in the child's file.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.



HB2185 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.